Washington statutes.
RCW 32.12.010

Deposits by individuals governed by chapter 30.22 RCW—Other deposits which a savings bank may establish—Limitations.

Deposits made by individuals in a mutual savings bank under this chapter are governed by *chapter 30.22 RCW. In addition, other deposits which a savings bank may establish include but are not limited to the following:

(1) Deposits in the name of, or on behalf of, a partnership or other form of multiple ownership enterprise.

(2) Deposits in the name of a corporation, society, or unincorporated association.

(3) Deposits maintained by a person, society, or corporation as administrator, executor, guardian, or trustee under a will or trust agreement.

Every such bank may limit the aggregate amount which an individual or any corporation or society may have to his or her or its credit to such sum as such bank may deem expedient to receive; and may in its discretion refuse to receive a deposit, or may at any time return all or any part of any deposits or require the withdrawal of any dividends or interest. Any account in excess of one hundred thousand dollars may only be accepted or held in accordance with such regulations as the director may establish.

[ 1994 c 92 s 323; 1981 c 192 s 27; 1967 c 145 s 1; 1961 c 80 s 1; 1959 c 41 s 2; 1957 c 80 s 4; 1955 c 13 s 32.12.010. Prior: 1953 c 238 s 1; 1949 c 119 s 4; 1941 c 15 s 2; 1929 c 123 s 1; 1927 c 184 s 5; 1921 c 156 s 2; 1919 c 200 s 2; 1915 c 175 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3346.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.22 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.22 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Effective date—1981 c 192: See RCW 30A.22.900.